Utah statutes.
76-6-608.   Theft detection shielding devices prohibited -- Penalties.
(1)  A person may not knowingly:
(a) make or possess any container or device used for, intended for use for, or
represented as having the purpose of shielding merchandise from any electronic
or magnetic theft alarm sensor, with the intent to commit a theft of
merchandise;
(b) sell, offer to sell, advertise, give, transport, or otherwise transfer to
another any container or device intended for use for or represented as having
the purpose of shielding merchandise from any electronic or magnetic theft
alarm sensor;
(c) possess any tool or instrument designed to remove any theft detection
device from any merchandise, with the intent to use the tool or instrument to
remove any theft detection device from any merchandise without the permission
of the merchant or the person owning or in possession of the merchandise; or
(d)  intentionally remove a theft detection device from merchandise prior to
purchase and without the permission of the merchant.
(2) (a)  A violation of Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) is a class A
misdemeanor.
(b)  A violation of Subsection (1)(d) is a:
(i)  class B misdemeanor if the value of the merchandise from which the theft
detection device is removed is less than $300; or
(ii)  class A misdemeanor if the value of the merchandise from which the theft
detection device is removed is or exceeds $300.
(3)  A violation of Subsection (1) is a separate offense from any offense
listed in Title 76, Chapter 6, Part 4, Theft, or Part 6, Retail Theft.
(4)  Criminal prosecutions under this section do not affect any person's right
of civil action for redress for damages suffered as a result of any violation
of this section.
